Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-286.03
Expiration of probation; progress report; probation officer; duty; revocation of probation; county attorney; powers; revocation hearing.

(1) At least thirty calendar days before the expiration of any juvenile's term of probation, the probation officer shall send a progress report to the county attorney and to the juvenile's attorney of record. The progress report shall include all court orders relating to such term of probation, information on all conditions of probation, and information regarding the juvenile's compliance with, or violations of, such conditions.

(2) If the county attorney determines that revocation is appropriate, the county attorney may file a motion to revoke probation. If there is no attorney of record for the juvenile, counsel for the juvenile shall be appointed. If such motion is filed no later than fourteen calendar days before the expiration of the term of probation, the court shall schedule a revocation hearing prior to the date of expiration.

Laws 2025, LB530, § 18.